Louisiana, session 2026, HB43.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:441(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§441. Eligibility for retirement
A.
* * *
(2)(a) Any member hired on or after July 1, 2006, shall be eligible for
retirement if he has:
(i) Thirty-five years or more of service, at any age.
(ii) Five years or more of service, at age sixty or thereafter.
(ii)(iii) Twenty years of service credit at any age, exclusive of military
service and unused annual and sick leave; however, any person retiring under this
Item shall have his benefit, inclusive of military service credit and allowable unused
annual and sick leave, actuarially reduced from the earliest age that he would
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-465 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 43
normally become eligible for a regular retirement benefit under Item (i) or (ii) of this
Subparagraph if he had continued in service to that age. Any employee who elects
to retire under the provisions of this Item shall not be eligible to participate in the
Deferred Retirement Option Plan provided by R.S. 11:447 or the Initial Benefit
Option provided by R.S. 11:446.
(b) Except for members of the Hazardous Duty Services Plan, as defined in
R.S. 11:612, any member whose first employment making him eligible for
membership in one of the state systems occurred on or after January 1, 2011, and on
or before June 30, 2015, including any judge, court officer, governor, lieutenant
governor, clerk or sergeant-at-arms of the House of Representatives, secretary or
sergeant-at-arms of the Senate, or state treasurer, shall be eligible for retirement if
he has:
(i) Thirty-five years or more of service, at any age.
(ii) Five years or more of service, at age sixty or thereafter.
(ii) (iii) Twenty years of service credit at any age, exclusive of military
service and unused annual and sick leave, but any person retiring under this Item
shall have his benefit, inclusive of military service credit and allowable unused
annual and sick leave, actuarially reduced from the earliest age that he would
normally become eligible for a regular retirement benefit under Item (i) or (ii) of this
Subparagraph if he had continued in service to that age. Any employee who elects
to retire under the provisions of this Item shall not be eligible to participate in the
Deferred Retirement Option Plan provided by R.S. 11:447 or the Initial Benefit
Option provided by R.S. 11:446.
(c) Except for members of the Hazardous Duty Services Plan, as defined in
R.S. 11:612, any member whose first employment making him eligible for
membership in one of the state systems occurred on or after July 1, 2015, including
any judge, court officer, governor, lieutenant governor, clerk or sergeant-at-arms of
the House of Representatives, secretary or sergeant-at-arms of the Senate, or state
treasurer, shall be eligible for retirement if he has:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-465 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 43
(i) Thirty-five years or more of service, at any age.
(ii) Five years or more of service, at age sixty-two or thereafter.
(ii)(iii) Twenty years of service credit at any age, exclusive of military
service and unused annual and sick leave, but any person retiring under this Item
shall have his benefit, inclusive of military service credit and allowable unused
annual and sick leave, actuarially reduced from the earliest age that he would
normally become eligible for a regular retirement benefit under Item (i) or (ii) of this
Subparagraph if he had continued in service to that age. Any employee who elects
to retire under the provisions of this Item shall not be eligible to participate in the
Deferred Retirement Option Plan provided by R.S. 11:447 or the Initial Benefit
Option provided by R.S. 11:446.
* * *
Section 2. The cost of this Act, if any, shall be funded with additional employer
contributions in compliance with Article X, Section 29(F) of the Constitution of Louisiana.